Yamls/Pron-achym_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
#  The were proofread for golden standard by Larisa Ponomareva 2019-10-22
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


   Pronoun - ачым: # Reflexive Pronoun 'minä itse / я сам(а)'
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Nom+PxSg1: ачым
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Acc+PxSg1: [ачымӧс, асьӧс]
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Gen+PxSg1: аслам
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Abl+PxSg1: ассим
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Dat+PxSg1: аслым
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Ins+PxSg1: аснам 
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Com+PxSg1: [аскӧттям, аскӧттим]
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Car+PxSg1: [астӧгьям, астӧгйим]
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Cns+PxSg1: ачымла
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Cmpr+PxSg1: ассям
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Ine+PxSg1: асам 
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Ela+PxSg1: ассим
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Ill+PxSg1: асам
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Apr+PxSg1: асланям
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Apr+PxSg1+Comp: асланямжык # Comp muodot eivät esiinny teksteissä
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Egr+PxSg1: ассяням
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Egr+PxSg1+Comp: ассянямжык
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Prl+PxSg1: [асӧттям, асӧттим]
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Prl+PxSg1+Comp: [асӧттямжык, асӧттимжык]
     ачым+Pron+Refl+TerI+PxSg1: [асӧдззам, асӧдззим]
     ачым+Pron+Refl+TerI+PxSg1+Comp: [асӧдззамжык, асӧдззимжык]
     ачым+Pron+Refl+TerII+PxSg1: ачымви
     ачым+Pron+Refl+TerII+PxSg1+Comp: ачымвижык
     ачым+Pron+Refl+AprIne+PxSg1: асланям # Muodot Apr+muut sijamuodot ivät esiinny teksteissä
      ачым+Pron+Refl+AprIne+PxSg1+Comp: [асланямжык, асланьжыкам]
     ачым+Pron+Refl+AprEla+PxSg1: асланьсим
     ачым+Pron+Refl+AprEla+PxSg1+Comp: [асланьсимжык, асланьжыксим]
     ачым+Pron+Refl+AprIll+PxSg1: асланям 
     ачым+Pron+Refl+AprIll+PxSg1+Comp: [асланямжык, асланьжыкам]
     ачым+Pron+Refl+AprEgr+PxSg1: асланьсяням
     ачым+Pron+Refl+AprEgr+PxSg1+Comp: [асланьсянямжык, асланьжыксяням]
     ачым+Pron+Refl+AprPrl+PxSg1: [асланьӧттям, асланьӧттим]    ачым+Pron+Refl+AprPrl+PxSg1+Comp: [асланьӧттямжык, асланьӧттимжык, асланьжыкӧттям, асланьжыкӧттим]
     ачым+Pron+Refl+AprTerI+PxSg1: [асланьӧдззам, асланьӧдззим]
     ачым+Pron+Refl+AprTerI+PxSg1+Comp: [асланьӧдззамжык, асланьӧдззимжык, асланьжыкӧдззам, асланьжыкӧдззим]
     ачым+Pron+Refl+AprTerII+PxSg1: асланямви
     ачым+Pron+Refl+AprTerII+PxSg1+Comp: асланямвижык
 

# Pronoun - асьным: # Reflexive Pronoun 'me itse / мы сами'
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Nom+PxPl1: асьным
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Acc+PxPl1: асьнымӧс
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Gen+PxPl1: асланым
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Abl+PxPl1: ассиным
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Dat+PxPl1: аслыным
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Ins+PxPl1: аснаным 
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Com+PxPl1: [аскӧттяным, аскӧттиным]
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Car+PxPl1: [астӧгьяным, астӧгйиным]
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Cns+PxPl1: асьнымла
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Cmpr+PxPl1: ассяным
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Ine+PxPl1: асаным 
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Ela+PxPl1: ассиным
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Ill+PxPl1: асаным
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Apr+PxPl1: [асланяным, асьнымлань]
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Apr+PxPl1+Comp: [асланянымжык, асьнымланьжык, асьнымжыклань] # Comp muodot eivät esiinny teksteissä
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Egr+PxPl1: [ассяняным, асьнымсянь]
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Egr+PxPl1+Comp: [ассянянымжык, асьнымсяньжык, асьнымжыксянь]
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Prl+PxPl1: [асӧттяным, асӧттиным]
     ачым+Pron+Refl+Prl+PxPl1+Comp: [асӧттянымжык, асӧттинымжык]
     ачым+Pron+Refl+TerI+PxPl1: [асӧдззаным, асӧдззиным]
     ачым+Pron+Refl+TerI+PxPl1+Comp: [асӧдззанымжык, асӧдззинымжык]
     ачым+Pron+Refl+TerII+PxPl1: асьнымви
     ачым+Pron+Refl+TerII+PxPl1+Comp: [асьнымвижык, асьнымжыкви]
     ачым+Pron+Refl+AprIne+PxPl1: [асланяным, асьнымланьын] # Muodot Apr+muut sijamuodot ivät esiinny teksteissä
     ачым+Pron+Refl+AprIne+PxPl1+Comp: [асланянымжык, асланьжыканым, асьнымланьынжык, асьнымжыкланьын]
     ачым+Pron+Refl+AprEla+PxPl1: [асланьсиным, асьнымланись]
     ачым+Pron+Refl+AprEla+PxPl1+Comp: [асланьсинымжык, асланьжыксиным, асьнымланисьжык, асьнымжыкланись]
     ачым+Pron+Refl+AprIll+PxPl1: [асланяным, асьнымланьӧ] 
     ачым+Pron+Refl+AprIll+PxPl1+Comp: [асланянымжык, асланьжыканым, асьнымланьӧжык, асьнымжыкланьӧ]
     ачым+Pron+Refl+AprEgr+PxPl1: [асланьсяняным, асьнымланьсянь]
     ачым+Pron+Refl+AprEgr+PxPl1+Comp: [асланьсянянымжык, асланьжыксяняным, асьнымланьсяньжык, асьнымжыкланьсянь]
     ачым+Pron+Refl+AprPrl+PxPl1: [асланьӧттяным, асланьӧттиным, асьнымланьӧт]
     ачым+Pron+Refl+AprPrl+PxPl1+Comp: [асланьӧттянымжык, асланьӧттинымжык, асланьжыкӧттяным, асланьжыкӧттиным, асьнымланьӧтжык, асьнымжыкланьӧт]
     ачым+Pron+Refl+AprTerI+PxPl1: [асланьӧдззаным, асланьӧдззиным, асьнымланьӧдз]
     ачым+Pron+Refl+AprTerI+PxPl1+Comp: [асланьӧдззанымжык, асланьӧдззинымжык, асланьжыкӧдззаным, асланьжыкӧдззиным, асьнымланьӧдзжык, асьнымжыкланьӧдз]
     ачым+Pron+Refl+AprTerII+PxPl1: асьнымланьви
     ачым+Pron+Refl+AprTerII+PxPl1+Comp: [асьнымланьвижык, асьнымжыкланьви]
 
